ne_affix.dat
SFX V Y 339
SFX V 0 सक्दिनथी [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिँदा [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिँदै [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइँन [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइएला [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइछस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइन [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइनस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइनेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिई [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिए [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएका [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएको [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएछौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएन [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएनौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएर [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिएस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनु [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनुभयो [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनुहुन्छ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिने [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनेछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनेछस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनेछु [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनेछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनेछौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिनेबारे [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छु [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छे [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छेस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्छ्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्थिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्थिस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्थी [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्थे [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिन्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दियो [िइ]
SFX V 0 दियौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 दियौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 देओस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिउन्जेल [िइ]
SFX V 0 दिइन्जेल [िइ]
SFX V 0 देला [िइ]
SFX V 0 नछिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 नुपर्दछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 नुहुँदैन [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदा [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदिनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदी [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदैन [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदैनथे [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदैनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदैनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदैनौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदो [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहँदिनथी [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनु [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनुभए [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनुभएको [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनुभयो [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनुहुन्छ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहने [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनेछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनेछस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनेछु [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनेछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनेछौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहनेबारे [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्छ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्छन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्छस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्छिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्छु [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्छौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्थिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्थिस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्थी [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्थे [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहन्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहला [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहिँन [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहिएला [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहिन [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहिनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहिनस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहिनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रही [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहे [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेका [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेको [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेछौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेन [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेनौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेर [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहेस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रहोस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 रह्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 रह्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 रह्यौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखिँन [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखिएछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखिनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखिनस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखिनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखिन [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखिस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखी [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखे [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखेका [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखेको [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखेन [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखेनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखेनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखेनौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राखोस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्छ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्छन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्छस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्छिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्छु [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्छेस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्छौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्छौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्थिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्थिस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्थी [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्थे [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्दछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्दिनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्दैन [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्दिनथी [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्दैनथे [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्दैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्दैनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्दैनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्दैनौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्न [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नु [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नुभयो [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नुहुन्छ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्ने [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नेछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नेछस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नेछु [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नेछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्नेछौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 राख्यौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिँन [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिएछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिएला [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिछस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिन [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिनस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिनेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिन्जेल [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिहालिएछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकिहालेछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकी [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकुन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकुन्जेल [िइ]
SFX V 0 सके [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेका [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेको [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेछौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेन [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेनौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकेर [िइ]
SFX V 0 सकोस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्छन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्छस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्छिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्छु [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्छे [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्छेस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्छौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्छौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्छ्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्थिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्थिस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्थी [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्थे [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दा [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दिनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दैछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दैछु [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दैछौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दैन [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दैनथे [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दैनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दैनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्दैनौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्न [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नु [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नुभए [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नुभएछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नुभयो [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नुहुन्छ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्ने [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नेछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नेछस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नेछु [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नेछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्नेबारे [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्यौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 सक्ला [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिएछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिएला [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिछस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिन [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिनस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिनेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालिस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाली [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाले [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेका [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेको [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेछौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेन [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेनौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेर [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालेस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हालोस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छु [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छे [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छेस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्छ्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्थिन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्थिस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्थी [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्थे [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दा [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दिनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दैन [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दैनथे [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दैनन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दैनौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दैनौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्न [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नु [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नुभयो [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नुहुन्छ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्ने [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नेछ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नेछन् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नेछस् [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नेछु [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नेछौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नेछौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्नेबारे [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्यो [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्यौ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्यौँ [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्ला [िइ]
SFX V 0 हाल्दिनथी [िइ]

SFX v Y 126
SFX v 0 ँदारहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नेथियो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपरिरहेको [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नेगर्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुन्न [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्ला [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नलाग्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुभएनछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुभयो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुभएर [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुभएको [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुभएन [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुभएका [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुभएछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्दा [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्दो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्दैन [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपरेर [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपरे [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपरेको [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपरेन [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपरेका [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्नेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्ने [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपर्छ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुपरेछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुने [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुन [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुँदै [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुँदा [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुँदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहोस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहोला [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुनेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नुहुँदैन [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 ँदोरहेछु [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 ँदोरहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 ँदारहेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 ँदोरहेछस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 ँदोरहेछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसके [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नु [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्ने [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दी [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छु [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छौँ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छेस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छिन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छ्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्छे [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नेछस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्थिस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्थ्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्थ्यौँ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्थे [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्थी [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्थिन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दैन [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दैनौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दैनौँ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दिनौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दैनन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नेछु [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दैनथे [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्यौँ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेनन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेर [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेन [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेनौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेनौँ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकोस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकुन्जेल [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिन [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिनस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिँन [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिनौ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिनन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकी [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिएला [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकुन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिछस् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिछन् [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकूँ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेको [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकेका [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्ला [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नुभयो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसकिएछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 नसक्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 िएछ [^उइि्]
SFX v 0 /V [^उइि्]
